Idaho, session 2025, S1199.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 32-1010, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-1010. IDAHO PARENTAL RIGHTS ACT. (1) This section through section
32-1014 32-1015, Idaho Code, shall be known and may be cited as the "Idaho
Parental Rights Act."
(2) The interests and role of parents in the care, custody and control
of their children are both implicit in the concept of ordered liberty and
deeply rooted in our nation's history and tradition. They are also among the
unalienable rights retained by the people under the ninth amendment to the
constitution of the United States.
(3) The interests of the parents include the high duty and right to nur-
ture and direct their children's destiny, including their upbringing and ed-
ucation.
(4) The state of Idaho has independent authority to protect its par-
ents' fundamental right to nurture and direct their children's destiny, up-
bringing and education.
(5) The protections and rights recognized in sections 32-1011 through
32-1014 32-1015, Idaho Code, are rooted in the due process of law guaranteed
pursuant to section 13, article I, of the constitution of the state of Idaho.
(6) Governmental efforts that restrict or interfere with these funda-
mental rights are only permitted if that restriction or interference satis-
fies the strict scrutiny standard provided in section 32-1013, Idaho Code.
(7) Nothing in this act shall be construed as altering the established
presumption in favor of the constitutionality of statutes and regulations.
(8) The provisions of the Idaho parental rights act are hereby declared
to be severable, and if any provision of the act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
the act.
SECTION 2. That Section 32-1013, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


32-1013. INTERFERENCE WITH FUNDAMENTAL PARENTAL RIGHTS RE-
STRICTED. (1) Neither the state of Idaho, nor any political subdivision
thereof, may violate a parent's fundamental and established rights pro-
tected by this act, and any restriction of or interference with such rights
shall not be upheld unless it demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence
that the restriction or interference is both:
(a) Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and
(b) The least restrictive means available for the furthering of that
compelling governmental interest.
(2) The foregoing principles apply to any interference whether now ex-
isting or hereafter enacted.
(3) Nothing in this act shall be construed as invalidating the provi-
sions of the child protective act in chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code, or
modify modifying the burden of proof at any stage of proceedings under the
child protective act.
(4) When a parent's fundamental rights protected by this act are vio-
lated, a parent may assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial
proceeding and may obtain appropriate relief against the governmental en-
tity.
(5) If a parent prevails in a civil action against the state, or a polit-
ical subdivision thereof, as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
parent is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(6) All civil actions brought pursuant to sections 32-1010 through
32-1015, Idaho Code, shall be initiated within two (2) years after the harm
occurred.
SECTION 3. That Section 32-1015, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-1015. PARENTAL RIGHTS IN MEDICAL DECISION-MAKING. (1) As used in
this section:
(a) "Governmental entity" means the state and its political subdivi-
sions.
(b) "Health care provider" means:
(i) A physician, health care practitioner, or other individ-
ual licensed, accredited, or certified to perform health care
services or provide counseling consistent with state law, or any
agent or third-party representative thereof; or
(ii) A health care facility or its agent.
(c) "Health care service" means a service for the diagnosis, screening,
examination, prevention, treatment, cure, care, or relief of any physi-
cal or mental health condition, illness, injury, defect, or disease.
(d) "Health information" means information or data, collected or
recorded in any form or medium, and personal facts of information about
events or relationships that relates to:
(i) The past, present, or future physical, mental, or behavioral
health or condition of an individual or member of the individual's
family;
(ii) The provision of health care services to an individual; or
(iii) Payment for the provision of health care services to an indi-
vidual.


(e) "Minor child" means an individual under eighteen (18) years of age
but does not include an individual who is an emancipated minor or who is
pregnant or has a child.
(f) "Parent" means a biological parent of a child, an adoptive parent
of a child, or an individual who has been granted exclusive right and au-
thority over the welfare of a child under state law.
(2) Parents have the fundamental right and duty to make decisions con-
cerning the furnishing of health care services to the minor child.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by this section or court order, an
individual shall not furnish a health care service or solicit to furnish a
health care service to a minor child without obtaining the prior consent of
the minor child's parent; provided, however, that nothing in this section or
elsewhere shall prevent a health care provider from screening and treating
a newborn infant for illegal drugs or substances, if a reasonable suspicion
suggests their presence.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section shall not apply, and a health care
provider may authorize or furnish a health care service without obtaining
the informed consent of the minor child's parent, if:
(a) A parent of the minor child has given blanket consent authorizing
the a health care provider to furnish the health care service health
care services to the minor child; or
(b) The health care provider is furnishing the health care service for
the purpose of detecting or diagnosing pregnancy or providing prenatal
or peripartum care, which shall not include abortion as that term is de-
fined in section 18-8702, Idaho Code;
(b) (c) The health care provider reasonably determines that a medical
emergency exists and:
(i) Furnishing the health care service is necessary in order to
prevent death or imminent, irreparable physical loss of life or
aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury
to the minor child; or
(ii) After a reasonably diligent effort, the health care provider
cannot locate or contact a parent of the minor child and the mi-
nor child's life or health would be seriously endangered by fur-
ther delay in the furnishing of health care services.;
(d) A minor child is seeking health care or medical treatment autho-
rized by paragraph (c) of this subsection that is directly related to an
allegation of a crime against the minor child or to collect evidence re-
lated to such crime when the collection of such evidence is time sensi-
tive;
(e) The minor child is accessing the services of the Idaho crisis and
suicide hotline or experiencing a mental health crisis and presents an
imminent risk of serious injury to self or others; or
(f) The service is limited to non-emergency first aid services and care
to a minor appearing or represented to be sick or injured.
(5) No health care provider or governmental entity shall deny a minor
child's parent access to health information that is:
(a) In such health care provider's or governmental entity's control;
and
(b) Requested by the minor child's parent.


(6) Subsection (5) of this section shall not apply if:
(a) Parent's The parent's access to the requested health information is
prohibited by a court order; or
(b) The parent is a subject of an investigation related to a crime an
act committed against the child, and a law enforcement officer requests
that the information not be released to the parent the records of which
are exempt from disclosure under section 74-105, Idaho Code.
(7) This section shall be construed in favor of a broad protection of
parents' fundamental right to make decisions concerning the furnishing of
health care services to minor children.
(8) This section does not make legal and in no way condones any abuse,
abandonment, or neglect, including any act or omission described in section
16-1602, Idaho Code.
(9) This section does not make legal and in no way condones euthanasia,
mercy killing, or assisted suicide, or permit an affirmative or deliberate
act or omission to end life, including any act or omission described in sec-
tion 18-4017, Idaho Code, other than to allow the natural process of dying.
(10) If a minor child does not have an affirmative right of access to a
specific treatment, service, or procedure, this section shall not be con-
strued to grant the parent a right to access such treatment, service, or pro-
cedure.
(11) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a court from issu-
ing an order that is otherwise permitted by law.
(12)(a) Subject to the limitations of chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code,
any parent who is deprived of a right as a result of a violation of this
section shall have a private right of action against the individual,
health care provider, or governmental entity.
(b) A parent may raise this section as a defense in any judicial or
administrative proceeding without regard to whether the proceeding is
brought by or in the name of the state, any private person, or any other
party.
(c) A parent who successfully asserts a claim or defense under this sec-
tion may recover declaratory relief, injunctive relief, compensatory
damages, reasonable attorney's fees, and any other relief available un-
der law.
(d) All civil actions shall be initiated within two (2) years after the
harm occurred.
(13) This section shall not be construed to prevent a parent of any age
who can provide consent for a minor child for any service or benefit that is
part of the federal special supplemental nutrition program for women, in-
fants, and children (WIC) to consent to any WIC service or benefit.
(14) When interpreting this section:
(a) No individual acting reasonably under the circumstances shall be
found in violation of this section by furnishing non-emergency first
aid services and care to a minor child appearing or represented to be
sick or injured. Such services and care may include dressing minor
wounds, applying topical agents, providing fluids or ice, and perform-
ing checks to identify minor illnesses; and


(b) This subsection shall not be construed to invalidate any protec-
tions or immunities granted to any individual administering first aid
services and care pursuant to any provision of Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.